data/hunspell-cat/catalan-valencia.aff
FLAG long
# Model de conjugació: capbussar
SFX 09 Y 84
SFX 09 r r/_v_Y_C ar
SFX 09 r nt/_v_Y_C ar
SFX 09 r t/_v_Y ar
SFX 09 r da/_Y ar
SFX 09 r ts/_Y ar
SFX 09 r des/_Y ar
SFX 09 ar o/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar e/_Z ar
SFX 09 ussar ús/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar es/_Z ar
SFX 09 r 0/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar em/_Z ar
SFX 09 r m/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar eu/_Z ar
SFX 09 r u/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar en/_Z ar
SFX 09 r va/_Z ar
SFX 09 r ves/_Z ar
SFX 09 r va/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar àvem/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar àveu/_Z ar
SFX 09 r ven/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar í/_Z ar
SFX 09 r res/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar à/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar àrem/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar àreu/_Z ar
SFX 09 r ren/_Z ar
SFX 09 r ré/_Z ar
SFX 09 r ràs/_Z ar
SFX 09 r rà/_Z ar
SFX 09 r rem/_Z ar
SFX 09 r reu/_Z ar
SFX 09 r ran/_Z ar
SFX 09 r ria/_Z ar
SFX 09 r ries/_Z ar
SFX 09 r ria/_Z ar
SFX 09 r ríem/_Z ar
SFX 09 r ríeu/_Z ar
SFX 09 r rien/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar e/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar i/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar es/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar is/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar e/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar i/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar em/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar eu/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar en/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar in/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar és/_Z ar
SFX 09 r ra/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar às/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar essis/_Z ar
SFX 09 r res/_Z ar
SFX 09 r ssis/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar esses/_Z ar
SFX 09 r sses/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar és/_Z ar
SFX 09 r ra/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar às/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar éssim/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar àrem/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar àssim/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar éssem/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar àssem/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar éssiu/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar àreu/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar àssiu/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar ésseu/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar àsseu/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar essin/_Z ar
SFX 09 r ren/_Z ar
SFX 09 r ssin/_Z ar
SFX 09 ar essen/_Z ar
SFX 09 r ssen/_Z ar
SFX 09 r 0/_D ar
SFX 09 ar e/_D ar
SFX 09 ar i/_D ar
SFX 09 ar em/_C ar
SFX 09 r u/_C ar
SFX 09 ar eu/_C ar
SFX 09 ar en/_C ar
SFX 09 ar in/_C ar

# Model de conjugació: començar
SFX 0A Y 84
SFX 0A r r/_v_Y_C ar
SFX 0A r nt/_v_Y_C ar
SFX 0A r t/_v_Y ar
SFX 0A r da/_Y ar
SFX 0A r ts/_Y ar
SFX 0A r des/_Y ar
SFX 0A ar o/_Z ar
SFX 0A çar ce/_Z ar
SFX 0A ar 0/_Z ar
SFX 0A çar ces/_Z ar
SFX 0A r 0/_Z ar
SFX 0A çar cem/_Z ar
SFX 0A r m/_Z ar
SFX 0A çar ceu/_Z ar
SFX 0A r u/_Z ar
SFX 0A çar cen/_Z ar
SFX 0A r va/_Z ar
SFX 0A r ves/_Z ar
SFX 0A r va/_Z ar
SFX 0A ar àvem/_Z ar
SFX 0A ar àveu/_Z ar
SFX 0A r ven/_Z ar
SFX 0A çar cí/_Z ar
SFX 0A r res/_Z ar
SFX 0A ar à/_Z ar
SFX 0A ar àrem/_Z ar
SFX 0A ar àreu/_Z ar
SFX 0A r ren/_Z ar
SFX 0A r ré/_Z ar
SFX 0A r ràs/_Z ar
SFX 0A r rà/_Z ar
SFX 0A r rem/_Z ar
SFX 0A r reu/_Z ar
SFX 0A r ran/_Z ar
SFX 0A r ria/_Z ar
SFX 0A r ries/_Z ar
SFX 0A r ria/_Z ar
SFX 0A r ríem/_Z ar
SFX 0A r ríeu/_Z ar
SFX 0A r rien/_Z ar
SFX 0A çar ce/_Z ar
SFX 0A çar ci/_Z ar
SFX 0A çar ces/_Z ar
SFX 0A çar cis/_Z ar
SFX 0A çar ce/_Z ar
SFX 0A çar ci/_Z ar
SFX 0A çar cem/_Z ar
SFX 0A çar ceu/_Z ar
SFX 0A çar cen/_Z ar
SFX 0A çar cin/_Z ar
SFX 0A çar cés/_Z ar
SFX 0A r ra/_Z ar
SFX 0A ar às/_Z ar
SFX 0A çar cessis/_Z ar
SFX 0A r res/_Z ar
SFX 0A r ssis/_Z ar
SFX 0A çar cesses/_Z ar
SFX 0A r sses/_Z ar
SFX 0A çar cés/_Z ar
SFX 0A r ra/_Z ar
SFX 0A ar às/_Z ar
SFX 0A çar céssim/_Z ar
SFX 0A ar àrem/_Z ar
SFX 0A ar àssim/_Z ar
SFX 0A çar céssem/_Z ar
SFX 0A ar àssem/_Z ar
SFX 0A çar céssiu/_Z ar
SFX 0A ar àreu/_Z ar
SFX 0A ar àssiu/_Z ar
SFX 0A çar césseu/_Z ar
SFX 0A ar àsseu/_Z ar
SFX 0A çar cessin/_Z ar
SFX 0A r ren/_Z ar
SFX 0A r ssin/_Z ar
SFX 0A çar cessen/_Z ar
SFX 0A r ssen/_Z ar
SFX 0A r 0/_D ar
SFX 0A çar ce/_D ar
SFX 0A çar ci/_D ar
SFX 0A çar cem/_C ar
SFX 0A r u/_C ar
SFX 0A çar ceu/_C ar
SFX 0A çar cen/_C ar
SFX 0A çar cin/_C ar

# Model de conjugació: crear
SFX 0B Y 84
SFX 0B r r/_v_Y_C ar
SFX 0B r nt/_v_Y_C ar
SFX 0B r t/_v_Y ar
SFX 0B r da/_Y ar
SFX 0B r ts/_Y ar
SFX 0B r des/_Y ar
SFX 0B ar o/_Z ar
SFX 0B ar e/_Z ar
SFX 0B ar i/_Z ar
SFX 0B ar es/_Z ar
SFX 0B r 0/_Z ar
SFX 0B ar em/_Z ar
SFX 0B r m/_Z ar
SFX 0B ar eu/_Z ar
SFX 0B r u/_Z ar
SFX 0B ar en/_Z ar
SFX 0B r va/_Z ar
SFX 0B r ves/_Z ar
SFX 0B r va/_Z ar
SFX 0B ar àvem/_Z ar
SFX 0B ar àveu/_Z ar
SFX 0B r ven/_Z ar
SFX 0B ar í/_Z ar
SFX 0B r res/_Z ar
SFX 0B ar à/_Z ar
SFX 0B ar àrem/_Z ar
SFX 0B ar àreu/_Z ar
SFX 0B r ren/_Z ar
SFX 0B r ré/_Z ar
SFX 0B r ràs/_Z ar
SFX 0B r rà/_Z ar
SFX 0B r rem/_Z ar
SFX 0B r reu/_Z ar
SFX 0B r ran/_Z ar
SFX 0B r ria/_Z ar
SFX 0B r ries/_Z ar
SFX 0B r ria/_Z ar
SFX 0B r ríem/_Z ar
SFX 0B r ríeu/_Z ar
SFX 0B r rien/_Z ar
SFX 0B ar e/_Z ar
SFX 0B ar ï/_Z ar
SFX 0B ar es/_Z ar
SFX 0B ar ïs/_Z ar
SFX 0B ar e/_Z ar
SFX 0B ar ï/_Z ar
SFX 0B ar em/_Z ar
SFX 0B ar eu/_Z ar
SFX 0B ar en/_Z ar
SFX 0B ar ïn/_Z ar
SFX 0B ar és/_Z ar
SFX 0B r ra/_Z ar
SFX 0B ar às/_Z ar
SFX 0B ar essis/_Z ar
SFX 0B r res/_Z ar
SFX 0B r ssis/_Z ar
SFX 0B ar esses/_Z ar
SFX 0B r sses/_Z ar
SFX 0B ar és/_Z ar
SFX 0B r ra/_Z ar
SFX 0B ar às/_Z ar
SFX 0B ar éssim/_Z ar
SFX 0B ar àrem/_Z ar
SFX 0B ar àssim/_Z ar
SFX 0B ar éssem/_Z ar
SFX 0B ar àssem/_Z ar
SFX 0B ar éssiu/_Z ar
SFX 0B ar àreu/_Z ar
SFX 0B ar àssiu/_Z ar
SFX 0B ar ésseu/_Z ar
SFX 0B ar àsseu/_Z ar
SFX 0B ar essin/_Z ar
SFX 0B r ren/_Z ar
SFX 0B r ssin/_Z ar
SFX 0B ar essen/_Z ar
SFX 0B r ssen/_Z ar
SFX 0B r 0/_D ar
SFX 0B ar e/_D ar
SFX 0B ar ï/_D ar
SFX 0B ar em/_C ar
SFX 0B r u/_C ar
SFX 0B ar eu/_C ar
SFX 0B ar en/_C ar
SFX 0B ar ïn/_C ar

# Model de conjugació: envejar
SFX 0C Y 84
SFX 0C r r/_v_Y_C ar
SFX 0C r nt/_v_Y_C ar
SFX 0C r t/_v_Y ar
SFX 0C r da/_Y ar
SFX 0C r ts/_Y ar
SFX 0C r des/_Y ar
SFX 0C ar o/_Z ar
SFX 0C jar ge/_Z ar
SFX 0C jar ig/_Z ar
SFX 0C jar ges/_Z ar
SFX 0C r 0/_Z ar
SFX 0C jar gem/_Z ar
SFX 0C r m/_Z ar
SFX 0C jar geu/_Z ar
SFX 0C r u/_Z ar
SFX 0C jar gen/_Z ar
SFX 0C r va/_Z ar
SFX 0C r ves/_Z ar
SFX 0C r va/_Z ar
SFX 0C ar àvem/_Z ar
SFX 0C ar àveu/_Z ar
SFX 0C r ven/_Z ar
SFX 0C jar gí/_Z ar
SFX 0C r res/_Z ar
SFX 0C ar à/_Z ar
SFX 0C ar àrem/_Z ar
SFX 0C ar àreu/_Z ar
SFX 0C r ren/_Z ar
SFX 0C r ré/_Z ar
SFX 0C r ràs/_Z ar
SFX 0C r rà/_Z ar
SFX 0C r rem/_Z ar
SFX 0C r reu/_Z ar
SFX 0C r ran/_Z ar
SFX 0C r ria/_Z ar
SFX 0C r ries/_Z ar
SFX 0C r ria/_Z ar
SFX 0C r ríem/_Z ar
SFX 0C r ríeu/_Z ar
SFX 0C r rien/_Z ar
SFX 0C jar ge/_Z ar
SFX 0C jar gi/_Z ar
SFX 0C jar ges/_Z ar
SFX 0C jar gis/_Z ar
SFX 0C jar ge/_Z ar
SFX 0C jar gi/_Z ar
SFX 0C jar gem/_Z ar
SFX 0C jar geu/_Z ar
SFX 0C jar gen/_Z ar
SFX 0C jar gin/_Z ar
SFX 0C jar gés/_Z ar
SFX 0C r ra/_Z ar
SFX 0C ar às/_Z ar
SFX 0C jar gessis/_Z ar
SFX 0C r res/_Z ar
SFX 0C r ssis/_Z ar
SFX 0C jar gesses/_Z ar
SFX 0C r sses/_Z ar
SFX 0C jar gés/_Z ar
SFX 0C r ra/_Z ar
SFX 0C ar às/_Z ar
SFX 0C jar géssim/_Z ar
SFX 0C ar àrem/_Z ar
SFX 0C ar àssim/_Z ar
SFX 0C jar géssem/_Z ar
SFX 0C ar àssem/_Z ar
SFX 0C jar géssiu/_Z ar
SFX 0C ar àreu/_Z ar
SFX 0C ar àssiu/_Z ar
SFX 0C jar gésseu/_Z ar
SFX 0C ar àsseu/_Z ar
SFX 0C jar gessin/_Z ar
SFX 0C r ren/_Z ar
SFX 0C r ssin/_Z ar
SFX 0C jar gessen/_Z ar
SFX 0C r ssen/_Z ar
SFX 0C r 0/_D ar
SFX 0C jar ge/_D ar
SFX 0C jar gi/_D ar
SFX 0C jar gem/_C ar
SFX 0C r u/_C ar
SFX 0C jar geu/_C ar
SFX 0C jar gen/_C ar
SFX 0C jar gin/_C ar
